src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-3lex_kiiras_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../..//generator-dict-gt-norm.hfstol
    Morph: ../../analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfstol
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:


  Noun - kiirâs: # MLO checked
    kiirâs+N+Sg+Nom: kiirâs 
    kiirâs+N+Sg+Gen: kirrâs
    kiirâs+N+Sg+Acc: kirrâs
    kiirâs+N+Sg+Ill: kirrâsân
    kiirâs+N+Sg+Loc: kirrâsist
    kiirâs+N+Sg+Com: kirrâsáin
    kiirâs+N+Sg+Abe: kirrâsttáá
    kiirâs+N+Ess: kirâsin 
    kiirâs+N+Par: kirâsid 
    kiirâs+N+Pl+Nom: kirrâseh
    kiirâs+N+Pl+Gen: kirrâsij
    kiirâs+N+Pl+Acc: kirrâsijd
    kiirâs+N+Pl+Ill: kirrâsáid
    kiirâs+N+Pl+Loc: kirrâsijn
    kiirâs+N+Pl+Com: [kirrâsijguin, kirrâsijgijn]
    kiirâs+N+Pl+Abe: kirrâsijttáá
